Mississippi, session 2026, HB223.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  (1)  The segment of Mississippi Highway 537 located in Jones County, Mississippi, beginning at Lake Como Road, and extending for a distance of approximately one (1) mile in the southernly direction to Doris Tanner's Flowers located at 3635 Mississippi Highway 537, Laurel, Jones County, Mississippi, is designated and shall be known as the "Sgt. John Howard Tanner Memorial Highway." (2)  The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.